Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5362.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 PART 1 LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch described in this part for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025 from the funds indicated in this part. The following is a summary of the appropriations in this part: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (100,000,000) Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (100,000,000) Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues (100,000,000) State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (100,000,000) Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (100,000,000) Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues (100,000,000) State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) STRATEGIC OUTREACH AND ATTRACTION RESERVE Michigan strategic site readiness program $ (100,000,000) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (100,000,000) Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Strategic outreach and attraction reserve fund transfer to Michigan strategic fund (100,000,000) State general fund/general purpose $ 0 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2024-2025 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is ($100,000,000.00) and total state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY Sec. 301. (1) In connection with the funds appropriated in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 part 1 for Michigan strategic site readiness program, the $100,000,000.00 authorized under Legislative Transfer Request 2025-3 for the Michigan strategic site readiness program must be returned and deposited into the strategic outreach and attraction reserve fund created in section 4 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.254. (2) Under Legislative Transfer Request 2025-3 that was approved by the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees in December 2024, $100,000,000.00 was to be used to support a grant to the University of Michigan for site development, construction, and other related eligible activities to construct at least 2 state-of-the-art advanced computing facilities in Ypsilanti, Michigan. The intent was for 1 of the facilities to be utilized primarily by the University of Michigan and for the other to be used by the Los Alamos National Laboratory for advanced research. Under this section, that part of Legislative Transfer Request 2025-3 is repealed and the Michigan strategic fund shall transfer the $100,000,000.00 to the strategic outreach and attraction reserve fund created in section 4 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.254, in accordance with subsection (1).